zh-CN: 包含酒吧用具: 瓶塞; 制冷/制冰块; 杯垫; 调酒器; 鸡尾酒工具; 开瓶器; 玻璃醒酒壶; 饮料饰物; 饮料搅拌棒; 锡箔切割器; 冰桶; 醒酒器; 酒瓶架; 其他
lt-LT: Komplekte esantys baro įrankiai: Įkišamas butelių kamštis; Gėrimų šaldymo kubelis; Padėkliukai; Kokteilių plaktuvas; Kokteilių įrankiai; Kamščiatraukis; Dekanteris; Taurės papuošimai; Gėrimų maišymo lazdelės; Folijos pjoviklis; Ledo kibirėlis; Vyno aeratorius; Vyno butelių laikiklis; Kita
sl-SI: Priložena barska oprema: Zamašek za steklenice; Hladilne kocke; Podstavki za kozarce; Šejker za koktajle; Pripomočki za koktajle; Zamašek; Dekanter; Okraski za pijačo; Mešalniki za pijačo; Rezalnik ovojne folije; Posoda za led; Prezračevalnik vina; Držalo za steklenice vina; Drugo
sk-SK: Položky barového vybavenia v cene: Zátka na fľašu; Chladiace kocky; Tácky; Šejker na koktaily; Koktailové nástroje; Vývrtka; Dekantér; Značky na poháre; Miešadlá na nápoje; Rezačka fólie; Vedro na ľad; Prevzdušňovač vína; Držiak na fľašu vína; Iné
pl: Naczynia barowe w zestawie: Zatyczki do butelek; Kostki chłodzące; Podstawki; Shaker do drinków; Narzędzia koktajlowe; Korkociąg; Karafka; Akcesoria do drinków; Mieszadełka do napojów; Nóż do folii; Wiadro na lód; Aerator do wina; Stojak na wino; Inne
zh-TW: 包含桿具品項: 瓶塞; 食用冰塊; 杯墊; 雞尾酒搖杯; 雞尾酒用具; 開瓶器; 玻璃酒瓶; 酒杯標識物; 飲料攪拌棒; 鋁箔切割機; 冰桶; 紅酒醒酒器; 酒瓶架; 其他
ru: Состав набора барной посуды: Пробка для бутылки; Кубики для охлаждения напитков; Подставки; Шейкер для коктейлей; Инструменты для коктейлей; Штопор; Графин; Украшения для коктейлей; Палочки для помешивания напитков; Резак для фольги; Ведерко для льда; Аэратор для вина; Держатель для винной бутылки; Другое
de: Barzubehör inklusive: Flaschenverschluss; Kühlwürfel; Untersetzer; Cocktail-Shaker; Cocktail-Utensilien; Korkenzieher; Karaffe; Getränkeanhänger; Getränkeumrührer; Folienschneider; Eiskübel; Weinbelüfter; Weinflaschenhalter; Sonstiges
cs: Obsažené barové nádobí: Zátka; Chladicí kostky; Pivní tácky; Šejkr; Koktejlové nástroje; Vývrtka; Dekantér; Přívěsky na nápoje; Míchadla na nápoje; Řezačka fólie; Kyblík na led; Provzdušňovač vína; Stojan na láhev; Jiné
ja: バーウェアアイテムが含まれています: ワインキャップ; アイスキューブ; コースター; ドリンクシェーカー; カクテルツール; コルク栓抜き; デキャンタ; ドリンクチャーム; マドラー; ホイルカッター; アイスバケツ; ワインエアレーター; ワインボトルホルダー; その他
es: Artículos de utensilios para bares incluidos: Tapón para botella; Cubos para enfriar; Posavasos; Coctelera; Herramientas de cóctel; Sacacorchos; Decantador; Adornos para bebidas; Mezcladores de bebidas; Cortacápsulas; Cubitera; Oxigenador de vino; Soporte para botella de vino; Otros
bg-BG: Включено оборудване за бар: Запушалка за бутилка; Охлаждащи кубчета; Подложки за чаши; Шейкър за коктейли; Инструменти за коктейли; Тирбушон; Декантер; Декорации за чаши; Бъркалки за напитки; Резачка за фолио; Кофа за лед; Аератор за вино; Поставки за бутилки за вино; Други
hu: A tartalmazott bárkellékek: Palackdugó; Hűtőkockák; Poháralátétek; Koktélshaker; Koktélkészítő eszközök; Dugóhúzó; Dekantáló üveg; Pohárjelölők; Italkeverők; Fóliavágó; Jégvödör; Borlevegőztető; Borosüvegtartó; Egyéb
it: Articoli da bar inclusi: Tappo per bottiglia; Cubi refrigeranti; Sottobicchieri; Shaker da cocktail; Strumenti per cocktail; Cavatappi; Decanter; Charm per drink; Agitatori bevande; Taglia pellicola alluminio; Secchiello per il ghiaccio; Aeratori per vino; Portabottiglie; Altro
pt-BR: Itens para bar incluídos: Tampa para garrafa; Cubos de resfriamento; Porta-copos; Coqueteleira; Ferramentas para coquetéis; Saca rolhas; Decantador; Enfeites para bebidas; Misturadores de bebidas; Cortador de alumínio; Baldes de gelo; Arejador de vinho; Suporte para garrafa de vinho; Outro
hr-HR: Uključeni artikli opreme za bar: Čep za bocu; Kocke za hlađenje; Podmetači; Shaker za pripremu koktela; Alati za pripremu koktela; Vadičep; Dekanter; Ukrasi za čaše; Miješalice za piće; Rezač folije; Posuda za led; Aerator za vino; Držač za vinsku bocu; Ostalo
en: Barware items included: Bottle stopper; Chilling cubes; Coasters; Cocktail shaker; Cocktail tools; Corkscrew; Decanter; Drink charms; Drink stirrers; Foil cutter; Ice bucket; Wine aerator; Wine bottle holder; Other
nl: Barartikelen inbegrepen: Flessenstop; Whiskystenen; Onderzetters; Cocktailshaker; Cocktailgereedschap; Kurketrekker; Karaf; Drankbedels; Roerstaafjes; Foliesnijder; IJsemmer; Wijnbeluchter; Wijnfleshouder; Andere
nb: Barartikler medfølger: Flaskestopper; Kjølebiter; Drikkebrikker; Cocktailshaker; Cocktailverktøy; Korketrekker; Karaffel; Drikkeanheng; Drinkrørepinner; Foliekutter; Isbøtte; Vinareator; Vinflaskeholder; Annet
fr: Articles de bar inclus: Bouchon à vin; Glaçons réutilisables; Dessous de verres; Shaker; Outils à cocktails; Tire-bouchon; Carafe; Breloques de boisson; Agitateurs de boissons; Coupe-feuilles; Seau à glace; Aérateur de vin; Porte-bouteille de vin; Autre
tr: Bar gereçleri dahildir: Şişe tıpası; Soğutma küpleri; Bardak Altlıkları; Kokteyl çalkalayıcı; Kokteyl araçları; Tirbuşon; Sürahi; İçecek tılsımları; İçecek karıştırıcıları; Folyo kesici; Buz kovası; Şarap havalandırıcı; Şarap şişesi tutacağı; Diğer
da: Barudstyrsartikler medfølger: Flaskeprop; Køleterninger; Glasbrikker; Cocktailshaker; Cocktailværktøjer; Proptrækker; Decanter; Drinkcharms; Drinkrørepinde; Folieskærer; Isspand; Vinlufter; Vinflaskeholder; Andet
sv: Bartillbehörsartiklar som ingår: Flaskpropp; Kuber för kylning; Glasunderlägg; Cocktailshaker; Cocktailverktyg; Korkskruv; Karaff; Drink charms; Dryckesomrörare; Folieskärare; Ishink; Vinluftare; Vinflaskhållare; Övrigt
vi: Bao gồm các các đồ dùng quầy bar: Nút chai; Viên làm lạnh; Tấm lót cốc; Bình lắc pha cocktail; Dụng cụ pha cocktail; Đồ mở nắp chai; Bình đựng rượu; Đồ cài trang trí ly; Máy khuấy đồ uống; Dụng cụ cắt vỏ nút chai rượu; Xô đá; Dụng cụ sục rượu vang; Giá đế rượu vang; Khác
el: Περιλαμβάνεται εξοπλισμός ειδών για μπαρ: Πώμα φιάλης; Κύβοι ψύξης; Σουβέρ; Σέικερ για κοκτέιλ; Εργαλεία για κοκτέιλ; Τιρμπουσόν; Καράφα; Διακοσμητικά ποτών; Αναδευτήρες ποτών; Κόφτης μεμβράνης; Κουβάς πάγου; Διάταξη αερισμού κρασιού; Θήκη για μπουκάλι κρασιού; Άλλο
pt-PT: Itens de bar incluídos: Rolhas para garrafas; Cubos para refrigerar bebidas; Bases de copos; Shakers para cocktail; Ferramentas de cocktail; Saca rolhas; Decantador; Adornos para bebidas; Agitadores de bebidas; Cortador de película; Balde de gelo; Arejador de vinho; Suporte de garrafa de vinho; Outro
fi: Mukana baaritarvikkeet: Pullon korkki; Jäähdyttävät kuutiot; Lasinaluset; Cocktail-shakerit; Cocktail-välineet; Korkkiruuvi; Dekantteri; Juomalasiamuletit; Juomasekoittimet; Kapselileikkurit; Jääpala-astia; Viinin ilmaajat; Viinipullotelineet; Muu
ro-RO: Produse pentru bar incluse: Dop pentru sticlă; Cuburi de gheață reutilizabile; Suporturi pentru pahare; Shaker pentru cocktail; Instrumente pentru cocktail; Tirbușon; Decantor; Talismane identificare pahare; Bețe de amestecat băuturi; Aparat de tăiat folie; Găleată pentru gheață; Aerator de vin; Suport sticle de vin; Altele
th: รวมอุปกรณ์บาร์: จุกปิดขวด; พิมพ์ทำน้ำแข็ง; ที่รองแก้ว; กระบอกผสมเครื่องดื่ม; อุปกรณ์ชงค็อกเทล; ที่เปิดขวดไวน์; ดีแคนเตอร์; ของตกแต่งเครื่องดื่ม; ไม้คนเครื่องดื่ม; ที่ตัดฟอยล์; ถังน้ำแข็ง; ไวน์แอเรเตอร์; ที่วางขวดไวน์; อื่นๆ
ko: 바웨어 품목 포함: 병마개; 냉각 큐브; 컵받침; 칵테일 셰이커; 칵테일 도구; 코르크 따개; 디캔터; 칵테일용 장식물; 음료 교반기; 호일 커터; 얼음통; 와인 에어레이터; 와인 병 홀더; 기타